New Jersey, session 222, S2443.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1993, c.72 (C.39:3-27.46) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  Upon application of any person who is the holder of a Combat Infantryman Badge or Combat Action Ribbon, as certified on the applicant's DD-214 form or on a Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty, the [director] chief administrator shall issue, for the motor vehicle owned or leased by the person, distinctive plates bearing a design approved by the [director] chief administrator in addition to the registration number and other markings or identification prescribed by law. The plates shall bear the words "Combat Infantryman Badge" and depict the Combat Infantryman Badge emblem.  The fee for these plates shall be $15 in addition to the fees otherwise prescribed by law for the registration of motor vehicles. b.    The surviving spouse of a former holder of the Combat Infantryman Badge or Combat Action Ribbon who is eligible to operate a motor vehicle in this State under the provisions of R.S.39:3-10 may retain the special license plates obtained by the deceased spouse pursuant to this section for display on a motor vehicle registered to the surviving spouse under the provisions of R.S.39:3-4. c.     The [director] chief administrator shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the issuance and use of these registration plates. (cf: P.L.1993, c.72, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.